Maine, session 132, LD1044.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5224, sub-§2, ¶H, as amended by PL 2023, c. 472, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) A development district that is a tax increment financing district may not exceed
a total of 30 tax years beginning with the tax year in which the designation of the
development district is effective pursuant to section 5226, subsection 3 or, if
specified in the development program, the subsequent tax year, except that, during
the 10 calendar years after the general effective date of laws enacted during the
First Special Session of the 131st Legislature October 25, 2023, a district may be
extended an additional 20 years if the district uses in total at least 75% of tax
increment financing revenue for affordable housing projects or transit-oriented
development, or both. A district that is extended under this subparagraph may
continue to use the original assessed value of the district.
For purposes of this subparagraph, "affordable housing" means a decent, safe and
sanitary dwelling, apartment or other living accommodation for a household whose
income does not exceed 120% of the median income for the area as defined by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under the United
States Housing Act of 1937, Public Law 75-412, 50 Stat. 888, Section 8; "transit-
oriented development" means a type of development that links land use with transit
facilities by combining housing with complementary public uses, including jobs,
and retail or services establishments, that are located in transit-served nodes or
corridors rely on transit as one of the means of meeting the transportation needs of
residents, customers and occupants, regardless of whether the development is
located in a transit-oriented development district, area or corridor or a transit-
served node; and "original assessed value" means the taxable assessed value of a
district as of March 31st of the tax year preceding the year in which it was
designated by a municipality and approved by the commissioner under section
5226, subsection 2; and
Page 1 - 132LR1139(03)